Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2952
Waste animal products, defined; feed to animals; unlawful; exceptions.

As used in this section, waste animal products means all meat or other materials derived in whole or in part from animals that are the result of handling, preparing, cooking, or consumption of human food. For purposes of controlling the spread of dangerous diseases of animals, it shall be unlawful for any person to feed waste animal products to animals except as follows:

(1) The material is regulated and approved as feed under the Commercial Feed Act; and

(2) A person may feed waste animal products to his or her own animals so long as such waste animal products are obtained from the person's own household, and the animals so fed, if consumed, are consumed by no one other than the members of that household.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 52.

Commercial Feed Act, see section 54-847.